Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-39] Minimum qualifications
for independent review organizations. (a) To be eligible for approval
under this part to conduct external reviews, an independent review organization
shall have and maintain written policies and procedures that govern all aspects
of both the standard external review process and the expedited external review
process set forth in this part that include, at minimum:

(1) A quality assurance mechanism in place that
ensures:

(A) That external reviews are conducted
within the specified time frames of this part and required notices are provided
in a timely manner;

(B) The selection of qualified and impartial
clinical reviewers to conduct external reviews on behalf of the independent
review organization and suitable matching of reviewers to specific cases;
provided that an independent review organization shall employ or contract with
an adequate number of clinical reviewers to meet this objective;

(C) Confidentiality of medical and treatment
records and clinical review criteria; and

(D) That any person employed by or under
contract with the independent review organization complies with the
requirements of this part;

(2) Toll-free telephone, facsimile, and e-mail
capabilities to receive information related to external reviews twenty-four
hours a day, seven days per week that are capable of accepting, recording, or
providing appropriate instruction to incoming telephone callers during other
than normal business hours and facilitating necessary communication under this
part; and

(3) An agreement to maintain and provide to the
commissioner the information required by this part.

(b) Each clinical reviewer assigned by an
independent review organization to conduct an external review shall be a
physician or other appropriate health care provider who:

(1) Is an expert in the treatment of the medical
condition that is the subject of the external review;

(2) Is knowledgeable about the recommended health
care service and treatment through recent or current actual clinical experience
treating patients with the same or similar medical condition at issue in the
external review;

(3) Holds a non-restricted license in a state of the
United States and, for physicians, a current certification by a recognized
American Medical Specialty Board in the area or areas appropriate to the
subject of the external review; and

(4) Has no history of disciplinary actions or
sanctions, including loss of staff privileges or participation restrictions,
imposed or pending by any hospital, governmental agency or unit, or regulatory
body that raises a substantial question as to the clinical reviewer's physical,
mental, or professional competence or moral character.

(c) An independent review organization shall
not own or control, be a subsidiary of, or in any way be owned or controlled
by, or exercise control over a health carrier, health benefit plan, a national,
state, or local trade association of health benefit plans, or a national,
state, or local trade association of health care providers.

(d) To be eligible to conduct an external
review of a specified case, neither the independent review organization
selected to conduct the external review nor any clinical reviewer assigned by
the independent review organization to conduct the external review shall have a
material professional, familial, or financial conflict of interest with any of
the following:

(1) The health carrier that is the subject of the
external review;

(2) The enrollee whose treatment is the subject of
the external review, the enrollee's appointed representative, or the enrollee's
immediate family;

(3) Any officer, director, or management employee of
the health carrier that is the subject of the external review;

(4) The health care provider, the health care
provider's medical group, or independent practice association recommending the
health care service or treatment that is the subject of the external review;

(5) The facility at which the recommended health care
service or treatment would be provided;

(6) The developer or manufacturer of the principal
drug, device, procedure, or other therapy recommended for the enrollee whose
treatment is the subject of the external review; or

(7) The health benefit plan that is the subject of
the external review, the plan administrator, or any fiduciary or employee of
the plan.

The commissioner may determine that no material
professional, familial, or financial conflict of interest exists based on the
specific characteristics of a particular relationship or connection that
creates an apparent professional, familial, or financial conflict of interest.

(e) An independent review organization that is
accredited by a nationally-recognized private accrediting entity that has
independent review accreditation standards that the commissioner has determined
are equivalent to or exceed the minimum qualifications of this section shall be
presumed to be in compliance with this section to be eligible for approval
under this part.

The commissioner shall review, initially upon
approval of an accredited independent review organization and periodically
during the time that the independent review organization remains approved
pursuant to this section, the accreditation standards of the
nationally-recognized private accrediting entity to determine whether the
entity's standards are, and continue to be equivalent to, or exceed the minimum
qualifications established under this section; provided that a review conducted
by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall satisfy the
requirements of this section.

Upon request of the commissioner, a
nationally-recognized private accrediting entity shall make its current
independent review organization accreditation standards available to the
commissioner or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners in order for
the commissioner to determine if the entity's standards are equivalent to or
exceed the minimum qualifications established under this section. The
commissioner may exclude any private accrediting entity that is not reviewed by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(f) An independent review organization shall
establish and maintain written procedures to ensure that it is unbiased in
addition to any other procedures required under this section. [L 2011, c 230,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next